New York, session 2025-2026, A8979.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 392-k to read as follows: 3 § 392-k. Sale of medetomidine. 1. For purposes of this section, the 4 term "medetomidine" shall mean a sedative used for its hypnotic and 5 analgesic effects and that has been approved for use in humans and dogs. 6 2. The provisions of this section shall apply to the sale, offer for 7 sale, delivery, or distribution of all medetomidine regardless of the 8 weight. 9 3. No corporation, partnership, limited liability company, firm, 10 online platform, or any other business entity doing business within this 11 state shall knowingly sell, offer for sale, or deliver medetomidine to 12 individuals without proof of its intended use for institutional, veteri- 13 nary, or scientific purposes. 14 4. No corporation, partnership, limited liability company, firm, 15 online platform, or other business entity doing business within this 16 state shall knowingly sell, offer for sale, or deliver medetomidine to 17 individuals under the age of twenty-one. 18 5. Any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, firm, 19 online platform, or other business entity doing business within this 20 state which knowingly sells, offers for sale, or distributes medetomi- 21 dine shall require and retain sales records, proof of age, and proof of 22 use from all purchasers. 23 6. Any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, firm, 24 online platform, or other business entity doing business within this 25 state that violates the provisions of this section by knowingly selling, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13553-01-5 A. 8979 2 1 offering for sale, or delivering medetomidine shall be subject to a 2 civil penalty of not more than three thousand dollars for a first 3 violation, and sixty-five hundred dollars for each subsequent violation, 4 recoverable in an action by the attorney general of the state of New 5 York. All funds collected or received by the state from civil penalties 6 imposed under this section shall be deposited in the New York state drug 7 treatment and public education fund established pursuant to section 8 ninety-nine-jj of the state finance law. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 10 have become a law.